New Mexico, session 2026, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Six million dollars ($6,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environment for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to expand the supports available to owners of private drinking water wells, including support for well water testing and treatment. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233195.1